Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB657.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 52PROHIBITED ACTIVITIESSec.5201. (Reserved).5202. Use of credit history of insured.§ 5201. (Reserved).§ 5202. Use of credit history of insured.(a) Premiums.--An insurer or insurance producer may not deny, provide higher premium than otherwise, cancel or refuse to renew or raise the premium of personal insurance or life insurance due in whole or in part to an insured's or prospective 123456789101112131415161718 insured's credit history.(b) Enforcement.--Upon satisfactory evidence of a violation of this section by an insurer or insurance producer or on satisfactory evidence of conduct that would disqualify an insurance producer from initial issuance of a certificate of qualification under former section 604 or 622 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.789, No.285), known as The Insurance Department Act of 1921, or under Article VI-A of The Insurance Department Act of 1921, the department may pursue any one or more of the following courses of action, regardless of whether the insurer or insurance producer was previously authorized to utilize credit history by the department:(1) Suspend , revoke or refuse to renew the certificate of qualification or license of the offending party or parties.(2) Impose a civil penalty of not more than $5,000 for each action in violation of any of the provisions of this section.(3) Issue an order to cease and desist.(4) Impose other conditions as the department may deem appropriate.(c) Rules and regulations.--The department may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer this section.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:" Credit history. " A written, oral or other communication of information by a consumer reporting agency bearing on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing or credit capacity, which is used, expected to be used or collected in whole or in 20250HB0657PN0666 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 part for the purpose of serving as a factor in establishing insurance premiums or eligibility for coverage."Life insurance." A policy offered in accordance with Article IV of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921." Personal insurance. " Property and casualty insurance to be used primarily for personal, family or household purposes, including homeowner and private passenger automobile insurance.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0657PN0666 - 3 - 123456789